pt-BR: Sensor TPMS banda de frequência: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (banda dupla); 433 MHz; Outra/desconhecida; Outra
it: Banda di frequenza del sensore TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dual band); 433 MHz; Altro/sconosciuto; Altro
cs: Frekvenční pásmo senzoru TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dvoupásmový); 433 MHz; Jiné/neznámé; Jiné
sk-SK: Frekvenčné pásmo snímača TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dvojpásmové); 433 MHz; Iné/neznáme; Iné
nb: TPMS-sensorens frekvensbånd: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (tobånds); 433 MHz; Annet/ukjent; Annet
sl-SI: Frekvenčni pas senzorja TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dvopasovno); 433 MHz; Drugo/neznano; Drugo
es: Banda de frecuencia del sensor TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (banda dual); 433 MHz; Otro/desconocido; Otro
tr: TPMS sensör frekans bandı: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (çift bant); 433 MHz; Diğer/bilinmiyor; Diğer
pl: Pasmo częstotliwości czujnika TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dwuzakresowe); 433 MHz; Inne/nieznane; Inne
vi: Dải tần số cảm biến TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (băng tần kép); 433 MHz; Khác/không xác định; Khác
bg-BG: Честотна лента на TPMS сензора: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (двулентов); 433 MHz; Друго/неизвестно; Друго
ru: Частотный диапазон датчика TPMS: 315 МГц; 315/433 МГц (два диапазона); 433 МГц; Другое/неизвестно; Другое
ja: TPMSセンサー周波数帯域: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (デュアルバンド); 433 MHz; その他 / 不明; その他
ro-RO: Banda de frecvență a senzorului TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (bandă dublă); 433 MHz; Altele/necunoscut; Altele
el: Ζώνη συχνοτήτων αισθητήρα TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (διπλή ζώνη); 433 MHz; Άλλο/άγνωστο; Άλλο
fr: Bande de fréquence du capteur TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (double bande); 433 MHz; Autre/inconnu; Autre
hr-HR: Frekvencijski pojas TPMS senzora: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dvostruki pojas); 433 MHz; Ostalo/nepoznato; Ostalo
de: Frequenzband des TPMS-Sensors: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (Dualband); 433 MHz; Sonstiges/Unbekannt; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 胎压监测系统传感器频段: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz（双频）; 433 MHz; 其他/未知; 其他
hu: TPMS érzékelő frekvenciasávja: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (kétsávos); 433 MHz; Egyéb/ismeretlen; Egyéb
da: Frekvensbånd for TPMS-sensor: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dualband); 433 MHz; Andet/ukendt; Andet
nl: TPMS-sensor frequentieband: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dual-band); 433 MHz; Overig/onbekend; Overig
ko: TPMS 센서 주파수 대역: 315MHz; 315/433MHz(듀얼 밴드); 433MHz; 기타/알 수 없음; 기타
lt-LT: TPMS jutiklio dažnių juosta: 315 MHz; 315 / 433 MHz (dviejų dažnių juosta); 433 MHz; Kita / nežinoma; Kita
en: TPMS sensor frequency band: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dual band); 433 MHz; Other/unknown; Other
fi: TPMS-anturin taajuuskaista: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (kaksikaistainen); 433 MHz; Muu/tuntematon; Muu
th: ย่านความถี่ของเซ็นเซอร์ TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (คลื่นคู่); 433 MHz; อื่นๆ/ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: TPMS 感測器頻段: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (雙頻); 433 MHz; 其他/未知; 其他
sv: TPMS-sensorns frekvensband: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (dubbla band); 433 MHz; Övrigt/okänt; Övrigt
pt-PT: Banda de frequência do sensor TPMS: 315 MHz; 315/433 MHz (banda dupla); 433 MHz; Outro/desconhecido; Outro